Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.060

Claims involving liability or casualty insurance—Limitations—Exceptions to time limits.

The time limitations for presenting claims under this chapter do not accrue to the benefit of any liability or casualty insurer. Claims against the decedent or the decedent's marital community that can be fully satisfied by applicable insurance coverage or proceeds need not be presented within the time limitation of RCW 11.42.050, but the amount of recovery cannot exceed the amount of the insurance. If a notice agent provides notice under RCW 11.42.020, the claims may at any time be presented as provided in RCW 11.42.070, subject to the otherwise relevant statutes of limitations, and does not constitute a cloud, lien, or encumbrance upon the title to the decedent's probate or nonprobate assets nor delay or prevent the transfer or distribution of the decedent's assets. This section does not serve to extend any otherwise relevant statutes of limitations.

[ 1997 c 252 s 29; 1994 c 221 s 36.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.